Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,278
Diversion of utility services; additional remedies.

The remedies provided by sections 25-21,275 to 25-21,278 shall be deemed to be supplemental and additional to powers conferred by existing laws. The remedies provided in sections 25-21,275 to 25-21,278 are in addition to and not in limitation of any other civil or criminal statutory or common-law remedies.

Laws 1983, LB 350, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-331.04;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 424.

Criminal penalties, see sections 28-515.01, 28-515.02, 28-1311, and 76-2325.01.

One-Call Notification System Act, civil enforcement, see section 76-2301.